Vermont, session 2025-2026, H146.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
* * * Agency of Natural Resources; Agricultural Water Quality Program * * *
Sec. 1. 10 V.S.A. chapter 47, subchapter 3A is added to read:
Subchapter 3A. Agricultural Water Quality
§ 1351. PURPOSE
It is the purpose of this subchapter to ensure that agricultural wastes,
including manure, fertilizer, nutrients, pathogens, sediments, and pesticides,
do not enter the groundwater or waters of the State and that the regulation of
VT LEG #379219 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.146
2025 Page 2 of 68
agricultural water quality meets the requirements of the federal Clean
Water Act.
§ 1352. DEFINITIONS
As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Agency” means the Agency of Natural Resources.
(2) “Agricultural waste” means material originating or emanating from a
farm that is determined by the Secretary to be harmful to the groundwater or
waters of the State, including sediments; minerals, including heavy metals;
plant nutrients; pesticides; organic wastes, including livestock waste, animal
mortalities, compost, feed and crop debris; waste oils; pathogenic bacteria and
viruses; thermal pollution; silage runoff; untreated milkhouse waste; process
wastewater; and any other farm waste as the term “waste” is defined in
subdivision 1251(12) of this title.
(3) “Animal feeding operation” or “AFO” means a lot or facility where
livestock or domestic fowl have been, are, or will be stabled or confined and
fed or maintained for a total of 45 days or more in any 12-month period and
crops, vegetation, or forage growth are not sustained in the normal growing
season over any portion of the lot or facility. Two or more individual farms
qualifying as an AFO that are under common ownership and that adjoin each
other or use a common area or system for the disposal of waste shall be
considered to be a single AFO if the combined number of livestock or
VT LEG #379219 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.146
2025 Page 3 of 68
domestic fowl on the combined farm qualifies the combined farm as a large
CAFO as defined in subdivision (11) of this section or as a medium CAFO as
defined in subdivision (14) of this section.
(4) “Concentrated animal feeding operation” or “CAFO” means a large
CAFO, a medium CAFO, or a small CAFO.
(5) “CAFO permit” means a permit issued by the Secretary to a CAFO
under section 1356 of this subchapter.
(6) “Discharge” means the placing, depositing, or emission of any
wastes, directly or indirectly, into an injection well, into the waters of the State,
or into a significant wetland, including from a land application area under the
control of a CAFO or AFO, unless it is an agricultural stormwater discharge.
A discharge shall not be considered an agricultural stormwater discharge
unless it meets all of the following requirements:
(A) Precipitation is the primary cause of the discharge. A discharge
is not an agricultural stormwater discharge if its primary cause is farm
management, even if precipitation contributes to the discharge.
(B) The waste discharged is manure, litter, or process wastewater.
(C) The CAFO or AFO land applied the discharged manure, litter, or
process wastewater in accordance with a nutrient management plan that meets
the requirements of section 1364 of this subchapter.
VT LEG #379219 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.146
2025 Page 4 of 68
(7) “Domestic fowl” means laying-hens, broilers, ducks, turkeys, or
other animal types designated by the Secretary by rule.
(8) “Farm” means a parcel or parcels of land owned, leased, or managed
by a person that is devoted primarily to farming and that meets the threshold
criteria established under the Required Agricultural Practices, provided that a
lessee controls the leased lands to the extent they would be considered as part
of the lessee’s own farm. Indicators of control may include whether the lessee
makes day-to-day decisions concerning cultivation or other farming-related
actions on the land.
(9) “Farming” has the same meaning as used in subdivision 6001(22) of
this title.
(10) “Land Application Area” means the area under the control of an
AFO or CAFO owner or operator, whether it is owned, rented, or leased, to
which agricultural waste may be applied.
(11) “Large concentrated animal feeding operation” or “Large CAFO”
means an AFO that houses 700 or more mature dairy animals, 1,000 or more
cattle or cow or calf pairs, 1,000 or more veal calves, 2,500 or more swine
weighing over 55 pounds, 10,000 or more swine weighing 55 pounds or less,
500 or more horses, 10,000 or more sheep or lambs, 55,000 or more turkeys,
30,000 or more laying hens or broilers with a liquid manure handling system,
82,000 or more laying hens without a liquid manure handling system, 125,000
VT LEG #379219 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.146
2025 Page 5 of 68
or more chickens other than laying hens without a liquid manure handling
system, 5,000 or more ducks with a liquid manure handling system, 30,000 or
more ducks without a liquid manure handling system, or other livestock types,
combinations, or numbers as designated by the Secretary by rule.
(12) “Livestock” means cattle, cow or calf pairs, youngstock, heifers,
bulls, American bison, swine, sheep, goats, horses, cervids, camelids, ratites,
rabbits, pheasants, chukar partridge, coturnix quail, domestic fowl, or other
animal types designated by the Secretary by rule.
(13) “Manure” means livestock waste in solid or liquid form that may
also contain bedding, spilled feed, water, or soil.
(14) “Medium concentrated animal feeding operation” or “medium
CAFO” means an AFO that houses 200 to 699 mature dairy animals, 300 to
999 cattle or cow or calf pairs, 300 to 999 veal calves, 750 to 2,499 swine
weighing over 55 pounds, 3,000 to 9,999 swine weighing 55 pounds or less,
150 to 499 horses, 3,000 to 9,999 sheep or lambs, 16,500 to 54,999 turkeys,
9,000 to 29,999 laying hens or broilers with a liquid manure handling system,
25,000 to 81,999 laying hens without a liquid manure handling system, 37,500
to 124,999 chickens other than laying hens without a liquid manure handling
system, 1,500 to 4,999 ducks with a liquid manure handling system, 10,000 to
29,999 ducks without a liquid manure handling system, or other livestock
types, combinations, or numbers as designated by the Secretary by rule.
VT LEG #379219 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.146
2025 Page 6 of 68
(15) “Non-sewage waste” means any waste other than sewage that may
contain organisms pathogenic to human beings but does not mean stormwater
runoff.
(16) “NPDES Program” or “NPDES” means the National Pollutant
Discharge Elimination System Program of the federal Clean Water Act.
(17) “Process wastewater” means water directly or indirectly used in the
operation of an AFO or CAFO for any or all of the following: spillage or
overflow from livestock or domestic fowl watering systems; washing,
cleaning, or flushing pens, barns, manure pits, or other AFO or CAFO
facilities; direct contact swimming, washing, or spray cooling of animals; or
dust control. Process wastewater also includes any water that comes into
contact with any raw materials, products, or byproducts including manure,
litter, feed, milk, eggs, or bedding.
(18) “Production area” means that part of an AFO or CAFO that
includes the animal confinement area, the manure storage area, the raw
materials storage area, and the waste containment areas.
(19) “Required Agricultural Practices” or “RAPs” mean the
management standards and practices administered, amended, or adopted by the
Secretary under section 1360 of this subchapter.
(20) “Secretary” means the Secretary of Natural Resources.
VT LEG #379219 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.146
2025 Page 7 of 68
(21) “Sewage” means waste containing human fecal coliform and other
potential pathogenic organisms from sanitary waste and used water from any
building, including carriage water and shower and wash water. “Sewage” does
not mean stormwater runoff as that term is defined in section 1264 of this
chapter.
(22) “Significant wetland” has the same meaning as in section 902 of
this title.
(23) “Small animal feeding operation” means an AFO that is not a large
CAFO or a medium CAFO.
(24) “Small concentrated animal feeding operation” or “small CAFO”
means a small AFO designated as a small CAFO by the Secretary pursuant to
section 1357 of this subchapter.
(25) “Small farm” means a parcel or parcels of land:
(A) on which 10 or more acres are used for farming;
(B) that house not more than 199 mature dairy animals, 299 cattle or
eight cow or calf pairs, 299 veal calves, 749 swine weighing over 55 pounds,
2,999 swine weighing 55 pounds or less, 149 horses, 2,999 sheep or lambs,
16,499 turkeys, 8,999 laying hens or broilers with a liquid manure handling
system, 24,999 laying hens without a liquid manure handling system, 37,499
chickens other than laying hens without a liquid manure handling system,
1,499 ducks with a liquid manure handling system, 9,999 ducks without a
VT LEG #379219 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.146
2025 Page 8 of 68
liquid manure handling system, or other livestock types, combinations, or
numbers as designated by the Secretary by rule;
(C) that are not part of a CAFO; and
(D)(i) that house at least the number of mature animals designated by
rule under the RAPs; or
(ii) that are used for the preparation, tilling, fertilization, planting,
protection, irrigation, and harvesting of crops for sale.
(26) “Waste storage facility” means an impoundment made for the
purpose of storing agricultural waste by constructing an embankment,
excavating a pit or dugout, fabricating an inground and aboveground structure,
or any combination thereof.
§ 1353. POWERS OF THE SECRETARY
The Secretary, in furtherance of the purposes of this subchapter, may:
(1) adopt, revise, or amend rules as necessary to carry out the provisions
of this subchapter;
(2) appoint assistants, subject to applicable laws, to perform or assist in
the performance of any duties or functions of the Secretary under this
subchapter;
(3) enter any lands, public or private, and review and copy any land
management records as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this
subchapter;
VT LEG #379219 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.146
2025 Page 9 of 68
(4) solicit and receive federal or private funds; and
(5) cooperate fully with the federal government or other agencies in the
operation of any joint federal-state programs concerning the regulation of
agricultural pollution.
§ 1354. AGRICULTURAL WATER QUALITY SPECIAL FUND
(a) There is created the Agricultural Water Quality Special Fund to be
administered by the Secretary. Notwithstanding any other provision of law,
fees collected under this subchapter, fees collected under 3 V.S.A.
§ 2822(j)(2)(A)(v), and fees collected under 3 V.S.A. § 2822(j)(2)(B)(vi) shall
be deposited in the Fund.
(b) The Secretary shall use monies deposited in the Fund for the
Secretary’s implementation and administration of agricultural water quality
programs or requirements under this subchapter, including to pay salaries of
Agency staff necessary to administer and implement the programs and
requirements of this subchapter.
(c) Notwithstanding the requirements of 32 V.S.A. § 588(3), interest earned
by the Fund shall be retained in the Fund from year to year.
§ 1355. INSPECTION
(a) The Secretary may inspect any farm at any time to carry out the
provisions of this subchapter.
(b) After July 1, 2027, the Secretary shall inspect:
VT LEG #379219 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.146
2025 Page 10 of 68
(1) each large CAFO not less frequently than once per year.
(2) each medium CAFO and each small CAFO not less frequently than
once every three years;
(3) each small AFO not less frequently than once every five years;
(4) each small farm required to certify under section 1359 of this
subchapter and that is not a small AFO not less frequently than once every
seven years; and
(5) any farm that discharges to waters of the State, that contaminates
groundwater or drinking water, that violates the RAPs, that violates a best
management practice required by the Secretary under this subchapter, or that
violates a permit issued under this chapter within six months after the
discharge, contamination, or violation.
§ 1356. CAFO PERMIT REQUIRED
(a) After January 1, 2029, no person shall operate a large CAFO, a medium
CAFO, or a small CAFO without a CAFO permit issued by the Secretary
under section 1263 of this chapter.
(b) The Secretary may require the owner or operator of a large CAFO,
medium CAFO, or small CAFO to apply for a CAFO permit at any time.
(c) The Secretary may issue individual CAFO permits or general CAFO
permits for medium CAFOs or small CAFOs. The Secretary may only issue
individual CAFO permits for large CAFOs.
VT LEG #379219 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.146
2025 Page 11 of 68
(d) The Secretary may require the owner or operator of a medium CAFO or
a small CAFO covered by a general CAFO permit to apply for an individual
CAFO permit.
(e) CAFO permits for large CAFOs, medium CAFOs, and small CAFOs
shall satisfy the requirements of subsection 1263(d) of this title. In addition,
such CAFO permits shall:
(1) satisfy all requirements applicable to NPDES permits for CAFOs
under federal regulation, including requirements under 40 C.F.R. Parts 122 and
412 (2024);
(2) incorporate the following as terms and conditions:
(A) compliance with the RAPs;
(B) compliance with best management practices required by the
Secretary under section 1361 of this subchapter;
(C) the terms of a nutrient management plan that meets the minimum
requirements of section 1364 of this subchapter; and
(D) other terms or conditions that the Secretary considers necessary
to prevent agricultural waste from entering groundwater or waters of the State.
(f) CAFO permits for large CAFOs, medium CAFOs, and small CAFOs
and related application materials shall be public records. The Secretary shall
make CAFO permits for large CAFOs, medium CAFOs, and small CAFOs
available on the Agency’s website. The Secretary shall plot the location of any
VT LEG #379219 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.146
2025 Page 12 of 68
large CAFO, medium CAFO, or small CAFO permitted under this section on
the Vermont Natural Resources Atlas or similar platform.
§ 1357. SMALL CONCENTRATED ANIMAL FEEDING OPERATIONS;
DESIGNATION
(a) The Secretary shall designate a small AFO as a small CAFO upon
determining that the small AFO is a significant contributor of pollutants to
waters of the State.
(b) The Secretary shall not find that a small AFO is a significant
contributor of pollutants to waters of the State unless:
(1) the Secretary has conducted an on-site inspection of the small AFO;
and
(2)(A) the small AFO discharges into waters of the State through a
manmade ditch, drainage system, flushing system, or other manmade device;
or
(B) pollutants are discharged directly into waters of the State that
originate outside of the facility and pass over, across, or through the facility or
otherwise come into direct contact with the animals confined by the operation.
(c) The Secretary may determine that a small AFO is a significant
contributor of pollutants to waters of the State after considering the following
factors:
VT LEG #379219 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.146
2025 Page 13 of 68
(1) the size of the small AFO and the amount of agricultural waste
reaching waters of the State, groundwater, or drinking water;
(2) the location of the small AFO relative to waters of the State;
(3) the means of conveyance of agricultural waste to groundwater or
waters of the State;
(4) the slope, vegetation, rainfall, and other factors affecting the
likelihood or frequency of discharge of agricultural waste into waters of the
State or of contamination of groundwater or drinking water;
(5) the small CAFO’s record of compliance with requirements under
this subchapter; and
(6) other relevant factors as determined by the Secretary.
§ 1358. CONCENTRATED ANIMAL FEEDING OPERATION; ANIMAL
FEEDING OPERATION; RULES
(a) On July 1, 2027, the Secretary is transferred authority to administer and
enforce the water quality requirements of the Large Farm Operation Rules
(Large Farm Rules) and the Medium and Small Farm Operation Rules for
Issuance of General and Individual Permits (Medium Farm Rules) of the
Agency of Agriculture, Food and Markets, as those rules existed on July 1,
2027.
VT LEG #379219 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.146
2025 Page 14 of 68
(b) The Secretary may amend, repeal, or replace the Large Farm Rules and
Medium Farm Rules at any time in accordance with the requirements of
3 V.S.A. chapter 25.
(c) Not later than January 1, 2029, the Secretary shall replace the Large
Farm Rules and Medium Farm Rules pursuant to subsection (d) of this section.
(d) The Secretary, in consultation with the Secretary of Agriculture, Food
and Markets, shall adopt rules pursuant to 3 V.S.A. chapter 25 to prevent
agricultural waste from CAFOs and AFOs from crossing property boundaries,
from entering drinking water, and from entering the groundwater and waters of
the State. Such rules may address the following:
(1) program administration, enforcement, and appeals;
(2) management of agricultural waste;
(3) setbacks, standards, and siting criteria for expansion or new
construction;
(4) prevention of trespass and public nuisance; and
(5) other matters the Secretary considers necessary.
(e) The Secretary shall establish a process under which the Agency shall
receive, investigate, and respond to a complaint that a CAFO or an AFO has
allowed agricultural waste to cross property boundaries, to enter drinking
water, or to enter the groundwater or waters of the State.
VT LEG #379219 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.146
2025 Page 15 of 68
§ 1359. SMALL FARM CERTIFICATION
(a) A person who owns or operates a small farm shall submit to the
Secretary a form certifying whether or not the small farm complies with the
RAPs on or before January 1, 2027 and every three years thereafter.
(b) The Secretary may require any person who owns or operates a farm to
obtain a permit or submit a small farm certification under this chapter if the
person is not required to obtain a permit or submit a certification under this
chapter and the Secretary determines that the farm poses a threat of discharge
to waters of the State or a threat of contamination to groundwater or drinking
water.
(c) The Secretary may waive a permit or small farm certification required
under subsection (b) of this section upon a determination that the farm no
longer poses a threat of discharge to waters of the State or a threat of
contamination to groundwater or drinking water.
(d) A person who owns or leases a small farm shall notify the Secretary of
a change of ownership or change of lessee of a small farm within 30 days
following the change. The notification shall include the certification of small
farm compliance required under subsection (a) of this section.
(e)(1) During an inspection of a small farm, the Secretary shall identify
areas where the farm could benefit from capital, structural, or technical
VT LEG #379219 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.146
2025 Page 16 of 68
assistance in order to improve or come into compliance with RAPs and any
applicable permit, certification, or requirement under this chapter.
(2) The Secretary annually shall establish a priority ranking system for
small farms according to the water quality benefit associated with the capital,
structural, or technical improvements identified as needed by the Secretary
during an inspection of the farm. The Secretary shall submit the list of priority
projects to the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets to inform awards of
financial assistance under 6 V.S.A. chapter 215.
§ 1360. REQUIRED AGRICULTURAL PRACTICES RULE
(a) On July 1, 2027, the Secretary is transferred authority to administer and
enforce the Required Agricultural Practices Rule for the Agricultural Nonpoint
Source Pollution Control Program of the Agency of Agriculture, Food and
Markets, as those rules existed on July 1, 2027.
(b) The Secretary may amend, repeal, or replace the rules transferred under
subsection (a) of this section at any time in accordance with the requirements
of 3 V.S.A. chapter 25.
(c) Not later than January 1, 2029, the Secretary shall replace the rules
transferred under subsection (a) of this section pursuant to subsection (d) of
this section.
(d) The Secretary, in consultation with the Secretary of Agriculture, Food
and Markets, shall adopt RAPs by rule pursuant to 3 V.S.A. chapter 25. The
VT LEG #379219 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.146
2025 Page 17 of 68
RAPs shall be management standards to be followed by all persons engaged in
farming. These management standards shall address agricultural activities and
conditions that have the potential to cause agricultural waste to enter the
groundwater, drinking water, and waters of the State. The RAPs shall be
designed to protect water quality and shall be practical, as determined by the
Secretary. In addition, the RAPs shall meet the following conditions:
(1) The RAPs shall ensure that practices on all farms eliminate adverse
impacts to groundwater, drinking water, and waters of the State.
(2) The RAPs shall require any CAFO, AFO, or small farm to
implement a field-by-field nutrient management plan that meets the
requirements of section 1364 of this subchapter.
(3)(A) Except as authorized under subdivision (C) of this subdivision
(3), the RAPs shall prohibit a farm from stacking or piling manure, storing
fertilizer, or storing other nutrients on the farm:
(i) in a manner and location that presents a threat of discharge to a
water of the State or presents a threat of contamination to groundwater or
drinking water; or
(ii) on lands in a floodway or otherwise subject to annual flooding.
(B) Except as authorized under subdivision (C) of this subdivision
(3), the RAPs shall prohibit manure stacking or piling sites, fertilizer storage,
VT LEG #379219 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.146
2025 Page 18 of 68
or other nutrient storage located within 200 feet of a private well or within 200
feet of a water of the State.
(C) The Secretary may authorize one or more of the following:
(i) siting of manure stacking or piling sites, fertilizer storage, or
other nutrient storage within 200 feet, but not less than 100 feet, of a private
well or surface water if the Secretary determines that the site is the best
available site on the farm for the purposes of protecting groundwater quality,
drinking water quality, or surface water quality; and
(ii) siting of a waste storage facility within 200 feet of a surface
water or private well if the site is the best available site on the farm for the
purposes of protecting groundwater quality, drinking water quality, or surface
water quality and the waste storage facility is designed by a licensed engineer
to meet the requirements of section 1368 of this subchapter.
(4) The RAPs shall require the construction and management of
barnyards, waste management systems, animal holding areas, and production
areas in a manner to prevent runoff of waste to a surface water, the runoff of
waste across property boundaries, or the contamination of groundwater or
drinking water.
(5) The RAPs shall require cropland on a farm to be cultivated in a
manner that results in an average soil loss of less than or equal to the soil loss
tolerance for the prevalent soil, known as 1T, as calculated through application
VT LEG #379219 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.146
2025 Page 19 of 68
of the Revised Universal Soil Loss Equation or through the application of
similarly accepted models.
(6)(A) The RAPs shall require a farm to comply with standards
established by the Secretary for maintaining a vegetative buffer zone of
perennial vegetation between annual croplands and the top of the bank of an
adjoining water of the State. At a minimum the vegetative buffer standards
established by the Secretary shall prohibit the application of manure on the
farm within 25 feet of the top of the bank of an adjoining water of the State or
within 10 feet of a ditch that is not a surface water under State law and that is
not a water of the United States under federal law.
(B) The RAPs shall establish standards for site-specific vegetative
buffers that adequately address water quality needs based on consideration of
soil type, slope, crop type, proximity to water, and other relevant factors.
(7) The RAPs shall regulate, in a manner consistent with the Agency’s
flood hazard area and river corridor rules, the construction or siting of a farm
structure or the storage of manure, fertilizer, or pesticides within a river
corridor designated by the Secretary.
(8) The RAPs shall establish standards for the exclusion of livestock
from the waters of the State to prevent erosion and adverse water quality
impacts.
VT LEG #379219 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.146
2025 Page 20 of 68
(9) The RAPs shall establish standards for soil conservation practices
such as cover cropping.
(10) The RAPs shall allow for alternative techniques or practices,
approved by the Secretary, for compliance by an owner or operator of a farm
when the owner or operator cannot comply with the requirements of the RAPs
due to site-specific conditions. Approved alternative techniques or practices
shall meet State requirements to reduce adverse impacts to water quality.
(11) The RAPs shall include requirements for reducing the discharge of
agricultural waste to waters of the State from subsurface tile drainage on farms,
including requirements related to the installation of subsurface tile drainage on
farms. The Secretary may require an existing subsurface tile drain to comply
with the requirements of the RAPs for subsurface tile drainage upon a
determination that compliance is necessary to reduce adverse impacts to water
quality from the subsurface tile drainage. The RAPs shall require the owner or
operator of an AFO or CAFO to report the installation of new subsurface tile
drainage, including plans and maps, to the Secretary.
(12) The RAPs shall include requirements for activities occurring in
areas that are excluded from regulation by the Agency of Natural Resources or
are allowed uses under section 902 of this title because the area is used to grow
food or crops in connection with farming activities.
VT LEG #379219 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.146
2025 Page 21 of 68
(13) The RAPs shall include a process under which the Agency shall
receive, investigate, and respond to a complaint that a farm has contaminated
the drinking water or groundwater of a property owner.
(14) The RAPs shall authorize a farmer to petition the Secretary to
reduce the size of a perennial buffer or change the perennial buffer type based
on site-specific conditions.
(e) Compliance with the RAPS shall not entitle a farm to a presumption
that the farm does not discharge.
§ 1361. BEST MANAGEMENT PRACTICES
(a) The Secretary of Natural Resources may require any person engaged in
farming to implement a best management practice to prevent agricultural waste
from entering groundwater or waters of the State.
(b) Where the Secretary determines, after inspection of a farm, that a
person engaged in farming is complying with requirements under this
subchapter, including the RAPs, but there still exists the potential for
agricultural waste to enter groundwater or waters of the State, the Secretary
shall require the person to implement best management practices.
(c) When requiring a best management practice, the Secretary shall inform
a farmer of financial resources available from State or federal sources, private
foundations, public charities, or other sources to assist the person in
VT LEG #379219 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.146
2025 Page 22 of 68
implementing best management practices and complying with the requirements
of this subchapter.
§ 1362. SEASONAL APPLICATION OF MANURE
(a) A person shall not apply manure to land in the State between December
15 and April 1 of any calendar year unless authorized under this section.
(b) The Secretary may by rule adopt or amend a process under which the
Secretary may prohibit the application of manure to land in the State between
December 1 and December 15 and between April 1 and April 30 of any
calendar year when the Secretary determines that due to weather conditions,
soil conditions, or other limitations, application of manure to land would pose
a significant potential of discharge or runoff to a State water.
(c) The Secretary may by rule adopt or amend a process under which the
Secretary may authorize an exemption to the prohibition on the application of
manure to land in the State between December 15 and April 1 of any calendar
year or during any period established under subsection (b) of this section when
manure is prohibited from application. Any process established for the
issuance of an exemption may authorize land application of manure on a
weekly, monthly, or seasonal basis on authorized farms or fields in the State,
provided that any exemption shall:
(1) prohibit application of manure:
VT LEG #379219 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.146
2025 Page 23 of 68
(A) in areas with established channels of concentrated stormwater
runoff to surface waters, including ditches and ravines;
(B) in nonharvested permanent vegetative buffers;
(C) in a nonfarmed wetland, as that term is defined in section 902 of
this title;
(D) within 50 feet of a potable water supply, as that term is defined in
section 1972 of this title;
(E) to fields exceeding tolerable soil loss; and
(F) to saturated soils;
(2) establish requirements for the application of manure when frozen or
snow-covered soils prevent effective incorporation at the time of application;
(3) require manure to be applied according to a nutrient management
plan that complies with section 1364 of this subchapter; and
(4) establish the maximum tons of manure that may be applied per acre
during any one application.
§ 1363. AGRICULTURAL WATER QUALITY TRAINING
(a) The owners or operators of a CAFO, AFO, or small farm shall obtain
water quality training as approved by the Secretary. Training shall provide
information regarding:
(1) the prevention of discharges to waters of the State;
(2) the prevention of contamination of groundwater and drinking water;
VT LEG #379219 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.146
2025 Page 24 of 68
(3) the mitigation and management of stormwater runoff from farms;
(4) statutory and regulatory requirements for the operation of a CAFO,
AFO, or small farm;
(5) financial resources available to assist in compliance with statutory or
regulatory compliance;
(6) weather and soil conditions that increase the risk that agricultural
waste will enter groundwater, drinking water, or waters of the State;
(7) the management of subsurface tile drainage to prevent the discharge
of agricultural waste to waters of the State; and
(8) standards for nutrient management, including nutrient management
planning.
(b) The owner or operator of a CAFO, AFO, or small farm shall obtain
eight hours of approved training at least once every five years.
(c) The Secretary shall include the training required by this section as a
condition of any permit or certification required under this subchapter.
(d) The Secretary may approve training offered by other entities upon
request of the entity providing the training. All requests for approval to train
shall be provided to the Secretary at least 30 days prior to the scheduled
training dates. The entity will be required to submit information about the
training and attendees in a manner requested by the Secretary.
VT LEG #379219 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.146
2025 Page 25 of 68
§ 1364. NUTRIENT MANAGEMENT PLAN
(a) Nutrient management plans required under this subchapter shall, at a
minimum, be consistent with the requirements of Natural Resources
Conservation Service of the U.S. Department of Agriculture’s Nutrient
Management Practice Code 590 or other equivalent standards approved by the
Secretary.
(b) In addition to satisfying the requirements of subsection (a) of this
section, nutrient management plans for CAFOs required under this subchapter
shall, at a minimum:
(1) ensure adequate storage of manure, litter, and process wastewater,
including procedures to ensure proper operation and maintenance of the
storage facilities;
(2) ensure proper management of mortalities to ensure that they are not
disposed of in a liquid manure, storm water, or process wastewater storage or
treatment system that is not specifically designed to treat animal mortalities;
(3) ensure that clean water is diverted, as appropriate, from the
production area;
(4) prevent direct contact of confined animals with waters of the State;
(5) ensure that chemicals, pesticides, and other contaminants handled
on-site are not disposed of in any manure, litter, process wastewater, or storm
VT LEG #379219 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.146
2025 Page 26 of 68
water storage or treatment system unless specifically designed to treat such
chemicals and other contaminants;
(6) identify appropriate site-specific conservation practices to be
implemented, including as appropriate buffers or equivalent practices, to
control runoff of pollutants to waters of the State;
(7) identify appropriate site-specific practices to be implemented to
control discharges of pollutants from subsurface tile drainage to waters of the
State;
(8) identify protocols for appropriate testing of manure, litter, process
wastewater, and soil;
(9) establish protocols to land apply manure, litter or process wastewater
in accordance with site specific nutrient management practices that ensure
appropriate agricultural utilization of the nutrients in the manure, litter or
process wastewater; and
(10) identify specific records that will be maintained to document the
implementation and management of the minimum elements described in
subdivisions (1) through (9) of this subsection.
(c) The Secretary, in consultation with the Secretary of Agriculture, Food
and Markets, may adopt by rule additional nutrient management planning
requirements in order to protect groundwater and waters of the State.
VT LEG #379219 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.146
2025 Page 27 of 68
§ 1365. CERTIFICATION OF CUSTOM APPLICATORS
(a) Custom applicators of manure or other agricultural waste shall be
certified by the Secretary in order to operate within the State and shall comply
with all applicable statutory and regulatory requirements under this subchapter.
(b) Custom applicators shall demonstrate knowledge of the RAPs, rules
and permit requirements for CAFOs, rules for AFOs, and rules and
requirements related to nutrient management plan implementation.
(c) Custom applicators shall demonstrate competency in methods and
techniques used to minimize runoff from application sites, identification of
weather or soil conditions that may increase risk of field runoff, record
keeping, and other information deemed pertinent by the Secretary.
(d) Certified custom applicators shall train all employees and seasonal
workers in methods or techniques to minimize runoff to surface water,
identification of weather or soil conditions that may increase the risk of runoff,
the RAPs, rules and permit requirements for CAFOs, rules for AFOs, rules and
requirements related to nutrient management plans and nutrient management
plan implementation, and standards and restrictions for the application of
manure or other agricultural wastes. Records of training shall be maintained in
a manner prescribed by the Secretary.
(e) Certification shall be valid for five years from the date of issuance and
shall be renewable annually on a form and in a manner prescribed by the
VT LEG #379219 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.146
2025 Page 28 of 68
Secretary. Certified custom applicators shall complete eight hours of training
in each five-year period of certification. Completion of five-year training
requirements will serve as meeting the requirements for recertification.
(f) Certified custom applicators shall maintain records of the amount of
manure or agricultural waste applied by farm and field for a period of five
years and provide those records to the Agency upon reasonable request.
§ 1366. CERTIFICATION OF NUTRIENT MANAGEMENT PLAN
TECHNICAL SERVICE PROVIDERS
(a) Nutrient management plan technical service providers shall be certified
by the Secretary in order to operate within the State.
(b) Nutrient management plan technical service providers shall demonstrate
knowledge and competence related to the preparation and implementation of
nutrient management plans, including the following:
(1) calculating manure and agricultural waste generation;
(2) taking soil and manure samples;
(3) identifying and creating maps of all natural resource features;
(4) use of erosion calculation tools;
(5) reconciling plans using records;
(6) use of nutrient index tools;
(7) accounting for subsurface tile drainage; and
(8) requirements of this chapter and the federal Clean Water Act.
VT LEG #379219 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.146
2025 Page 29 of 68
(c) Certification shall be valid for five years from the date of issuance and
shall be renewable annually on a form and in a manner prescribed by the
Secretary. Certified nutrient management plan technical service providers
shall complete eight hours of training in each five-year period of certification.
Completion of five-year training requirements will serve as meeting the
requirements for recertification.
§ 1367. BASIN MANAGEMENT; APPEALS TO THE ENVIRONMENTAL
DIVISION
(a) Any person with an interest in the agricultural component of the basin
planning process may petition the Secretary to require, and the Secretary, in
consultation with the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets, may require
by rule, best management practices in the individual basin in order to achieve
compliance with the water quality goals in section 1250 of this chapter and any
duly adopted basin plan. The Secretary shall hold a public hearing within 60
days and shall issue a timely written decision that sets forth the facts and
reasons supporting the decision.
(b) Any person engaged in farming that has been required by the Secretary
to implement best management or any person who has petitioned the Secretary
under subsection (a) of this section may appeal the Secretary’s decision to the
Environmental Division de novo.
VT LEG #379219 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.146
2025 Page 30 of 68
§ 1368. WASTE STORAGE FACILITY
(a) No person shall construct a new waste storage facility or expand or
modify a waste storage facility unless the facility meets the standard
established for such facilities by the Natural Resources Conservation Service
of the U.S. Department of Agriculture or an equivalent standard. If an
equivalent design standard is used, the design and construction shall be
certified by the Secretary or a licensed professional engineer operating within
the scope of the engineer’s expertise.
(b) The Secretary may require the owner or operator of a waste storage
facility to modify the facility to meet the standard set forth in subsection (a) of
this section if the facility poses a threat to human health or the environment. If
the Secretary determines that a facility that meets the standard set forth in
subsection (a) of this section poses a threat to human health or the
environment, the Secretary may require the owner or operator of the facility to
implement additional management measures.
(c) If the Secretary suspects that a waste storage facility may be
contaminating groundwater, the Secretary shall pay the costs of any initial
groundwater monitoring to determine whether a facility poses a threat to
human health or the environment.
VT LEG #379219 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.146
2025 Page 31 of 68
§ 1369. MANAGEMENT OF NON-SEWAGE WASTE
(a) The Secretary may require a person transporting or arranging for the
transport of non-sewage waste to a farm for deposit in a manure pit or for use
as an input in a methane digester to obtain approval from the Secretary prior to
transporting the non-sewage waste to the farm. The Secretary may require a
person to report to the Secretary at a designated time one or more of the
following:
(1) the composition of the material transported to the farm, including the
source of the material; and
(2) the volume of the material transported to a farm.
(b) After receipt of a report required under subsection (a) of this section,
the Secretary may prohibit the import of non-sewage waste onto a farm upon a
determination that the import of the material would violate the nutrient
management plan for the farm or otherwise present a threat to water quality.
Sec. 2. 10 V.S.A. § 1259 is amended to read:
§ 1259. PROHIBITIONS
(a) No person shall discharge any waste, substance, or material into waters
of the State, nor shall any person discharge any waste, substance, or material
into an injection well or discharge into a publicly owned treatment works any
waste that interferes with, passes through without treatment, or is otherwise
incompatible with those works or would have a substantial adverse effect on
VT LEG #379219 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.146
2025 Page 32 of 68
those works or on water quality, without first obtaining a permit for that
discharge from the Secretary. This subsection shall not prohibit the proper
application of fertilizer to fields and crops, nor reduce or affect the authority or
policy declared in Joint House Resolution 7 of the 1971 Session of the General
Assembly.
* * *
(f) The provisions of subsections (c), (d), and (e) of this section shall not
regulate required agricultural practices, as adopted by rule by the Secretary of
Agriculture, Food and Markets, or accepted silvicultural practices, as defined
by the Commissioner of Forests, Parks and Recreation, including practices
which that are in compliance with the Acceptable Management Practices for
Maintaining Water Quality on Logging Jobs in Vermont, as adopted by the
Commissioner of Forests, Parks and Recreation; nor shall these provisions
regulate discharges from concentrated animal feeding operations that require a
permit under section 1263 of this title; nor shall those provisions prohibit
stormwater runoff or the discharge of nonpolluting wastes, as defined by the
Secretary.
* * *
(i) The Secretary of Natural Resources, to the extent compatible with
federal requirements, shall delegate to the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and
Markets the State agricultural non-point source pollution control program
VT LEG #379219 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.146
2025 Page 33 of 68
planning, implementation, and regulation. A memorandum of understanding
shall be adopted for this purpose, which shall address implementation grants,
the distribution of federal program assistance, and the development of land use
performance standards. Prior to executing the memorandum, the Secretary of
State shall arrange for two formal publications of information relating to the
proposed memorandum. The information shall consist of a summary of the
proposal; the name, telephone number, and address of a person able to answer
questions and receive comments on the proposal; and the deadline for
receiving comments. Publication shall be subject to the provisions of 3 V.S.A.
§ 839(d), (e), and (g), relating to the publication of administrative rules. The
proposed memorandum of understanding shall be available for 30 days after
the final date of publication for public review and comment prior to being
executed by the Secretary of Natural Resources and the Secretary of
Agriculture, Food and Markets. The Secretary of Natural Resources and the
Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets annually shall review the
memorandum of understanding to ensure compliance with the requirements of
the Clean Water Act and the provisions of section 1258 of this title. If the
memorandum is substantially revised, it first shall be noticed in the same
manner that applies to the initial memorandum. Actions by the Secretary of
Agriculture, Food and Markets under this section shall be consistent with the
VT LEG #379219 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.146
2025 Page 34 of 68
water quality standards and water pollution control requirements of chapter 47
of this title and the federal Clean Water Act as amended. [Repealed.]
* * *
Sec. 3. 10 V.S.A. § 1263 is amended to read:
§ 1263. DISCHARGE PERMITS
* * *
(g) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any person who owns or
operates a concentrated animal feeding operation that requires a permit under
the federal National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System permit
regulations shall submit an application to the Secretary for a discharge permit
and pay the required fees specified in 3 V.S.A. § 2822. On or before July 1,
2007, the Secretary of Natural Resources shall adopt rules implementing the
federal National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System permit regulations for
discharges from concentrated animal feeding operations. Until such
regulations are adopted, the substantive permitting standards and criteria used
by the Secretary to evaluate applications and issue or deny discharge permits
for concentrated animal feeding operations shall be those specified by federal
regulations. The Secretary may issue an individual or general permit for these
types of discharges in accordance with the procedural requirements of
subsection (b) of this section and other State law. For the purposes of this
VT LEG #379219 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.146
2025 Page 35 of 68
subsection, “concentrated animal feeding operation” means a farm that meets
the definition contained in the federal regulations. [Repealed.]
Sec. 4. 10 V.S.A. § 1264(d) is amended to read:
(d) Exemptions.
(1) No permit is required under this section for:
(A) Stormwater runoff from farms in compliance with agricultural
practices adopted by the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets the
agricultural water quality requirements of subchapter 3A of this chapter,
provided that this exemption shall not apply to construction stormwater
permits required by subdivision (c)(4) of this section.
(B) Stormwater runoff from concentrated animal feeding operations
permitted under subsection 1263(g) of this chapter.
(C) Stormwater runoff from accepted silvicultural practices, as
defined by the Commissioner of Forests, Parks and Recreation, including
practices that are in compliance with the Acceptable Management Practices for
Maintaining Water Quality on Logging Jobs in Vermont, as adopted by the
Commissioner of Forests, Parks and Recreation.
(D) Stormwater runoff permitted under section 1263 of this title.
* * *
VT LEG #379219 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.146
2025 Page 36 of 68
Sec. 5. 10 V.S.A. § 8003(d) is amended to read:
(d) Upon the request of the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets, the
Secretary may take action under this chapter to enforce the agricultural water
quality requirements of, rules adopted under, and permits and certifications
issued under 6 V.S.A. chapter 215. The Secretary of Natural Resources and
the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets shall enter into a memorandum
of understanding to implement this subsection. [Repealed.]
* * * Agency of Agriculture, Food and Markets; Repeal of Regulatory
Authority over Agricultural Water Quality * * *
Sec. 6. 6 V.S.A. chapter 215, subchapters 1–3 are amended to read:
Subchapter 1. General Provisions
§ 4801. PURPOSE; STATE POLICY
It is the purpose of this chapter to ensure that agricultural animal wastes do
not enter the waters of this State. Therefore, it is State policy that:
(1) All farms meet certain standards in the handling and disposal of
animal agricultural wastes, as provided by this chapter, and the cost of meeting
these standards shall not be borne by farmers only but rather by all members of
society, who are in fact the beneficiaries 10 V.S.A. chapter 47, subchapter 3A.
Accordingly, State and federal funds shall be made available to farms,
regardless of size, to defray the major cost of complying with the requirements
of this chapter. State and federal conservation programs to assist farmers
VT LEG #379219 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.146
2025 Page 37 of 68
should be directed to those farms that need to improve their infrastructure to
prohibit direct discharges or bring existing water pollution control structures
into compliance with U.S. Department of Agriculture (U.S.D.A.) Natural
Resources Conservation Service standards. Additional resources should be
directed to education and technical assistance for farmers to improve the
management of agricultural wastes and protect water quality.
* * *
Subchapter 2. Water Quality; Required Agricultural Practices and Best
Management Practices Education and Technical Assistance
§ 4810. AUTHORITY; COOPERATION; COORDINATION
(a) Agricultural land use practices. In accordance with 10 V.S.A. §
1259(i), the Secretary shall adopt by rule, pursuant to 3 V.S.A. chapter 25, and
shall implement and enforce agricultural land use practices in order to satisfy
the requirements of 33 U.S.C. § 1329 that the State identify and implement
best management practices to control nonpoint sources of agricultural waste to
waters of the State. These agricultural land use practices shall be created in
two categories, pursuant to subsections (b) and (c) of this section.
(b) Required Agricultural Practices. Required Agricultural Practices
(RAPs) shall be management standards to be followed by all persons engaged
in farming in this State. These standards shall address activities that have a
potential for causing agricultural pollutants to enter the groundwater and
VT LEG #379219 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.146
2025 Page 38 of 68
waters of the State, including dairy and other livestock operations plus all
forms of crop and nursery operations and on-farm or agricultural fairground,
registered pursuant to 20 V.S.A. § 3902, livestock and poultry slaughter and
processing activities. The RAPs shall include, as well as promote and
encourage, practices for farmers in preventing agricultural pollutants from
entering the groundwater and waters of the State when engaged in animal
waste management and disposal, soil amendment applications, plant
fertilization, and pest and weed control. Persons engaged in farming who are
in compliance with these practices shall be presumed to not have a discharge of
agricultural pollutants to waters of the State. RAPs shall be designed to protect
water quality and shall be practical and cost-effective to implement, as
determined by the Secretary. Where the Secretary determines, after inspection
of a farm, that a person engaged in farming is complying with the RAPs but
there still exists the potential for agricultural pollutants to enter the waters of
the State, the Secretary shall require the person to implement additional, site-
specific on-farm conservation practices designed to prevent agricultural
pollutants from entering the waters of the State. When requiring
implementation of a conservation practice under this subsection, the Secretary
shall inform the person engaged in farming of the resources available to assist
the person in implementing the conservation practice and complying with the
requirements of this chapter. The RAPs for groundwater shall include a
VT LEG #379219 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.146
2025 Page 39 of 68
process under which the Agency shall receive, investigate, and respond to a
complaint that a farm has contaminated the drinking water or groundwater of a
property owner. A farmer may petition the Secretary to reduce the size of a
perennial buffer or change the perennial buffer type based on site-specific
conditions.
(c) Best management practices. Best management practices (BMPs) are
site-specific on-farm conservation practices implemented in order to address
the potential for agricultural pollutants to enter the waters of the State. The
Secretary may require any person engaged in farming to implement a BMP.
When requiring implementation of a BMP, the Secretary shall inform a farmer
of financial resources available from State or federal sources, private
foundations, public charities, or other sources, including funding from the
Clean Water Fund established under 10 V.S.A. § 1388, to assist the person in
implementing BMPs and complying with the requirements of this chapter.
BMPs shall be practical and cost effective to implement, as determined by the
Secretary, and shall be designed to achieve compliance with the requirements
of this chapter. The Secretary may require soil monitoring or innovative
manure management as a BMP under this subsection. Soil monitoring or
innovative manure management implemented as a BMP shall be eligible for
State assistance under the Clean Water Fund established under 10 V.S.A.
chapter 47, subchapter 7. If a perennial buffer of trees or other woody
VT LEG #379219 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.146
2025 Page 40 of 68
vegetation is required as a BMP, the Secretary shall pay the farmer for a first
priority easement on the land on which the buffer is located.
(d) Cooperation and coordination. The Secretary of Agriculture, Food and
Markets shall coordinate with the Secretary of Natural Resources in
implementing and enforcing programs, plans, and practices developed for
reducing and eliminating agricultural nonpoint source pollutants and
discharges from concentrated animal feeding operations. On or before July 1,
2016, the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets and the Secretary of
Natural Resources shall revise the memorandum of understanding for the
nonpoint program describing program administration, grant negotiation, grant
sharing, and how they will coordinate watershed planning activities to comply
with Pub. L. No. 92-500. The memorandum of understanding shall describe
how the agencies will implement the antidegradation implementation policy,
including how the agencies will apply the antidegradation implementation
policy to new sources of agricultural nonpoint source pollutants. The
Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets and the Secretary of Natural
Resources shall also develop a memorandum of understanding according to the
public notice and comment process of 10 V.S.A. § 1259(i) regarding the
implementation of the federal Concentrated Animal Feeding Operation
Program and the relationship between the requirements of the federal Program
and the State agricultural water quality requirements for large, medium, and
VT LEG #379219 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.146
2025 Page 41 of 68
small farms under this chapter. The memorandum of understanding shall
describe Program administration, permit issuance, an appellate process, and
enforcement authority and implementation. The memorandum of
understanding shall be consistent with the federal National Pollutant Discharge
Elimination System permit regulations for discharges from concentrated
animal feeding operations. The allocation of duties under this chapter between
the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets and the Secretary of Natural
Resources shall be consistent with the Secretary’s duties, established under the
provisions of 10 V.S.A. § 1258(b), to comply with Pub. L. No. 92-500. The
Secretary of Natural Resources shall be the State lead person in applying for
federal funds under Pub. L. No. 92-500 but shall consult with the Secretary of
Agriculture, Food and Markets during the process. The agricultural nonpoint
source program may compete with other programs for competitive watershed
projects funded from federal funds. The Secretary of Agriculture, Food and
Markets shall be represented in reviewing these projects for funding. Actions
by the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets under this chapter
concerning agricultural nonpoint source pollution shall be consistent with the
water quality standards and water pollution control requirements of 10 V.S.A.
chapter 47 and the federal Clean Water Act as amended. In addition, the
Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets shall coordinate with the Secretary
of Natural Resources in implementing and enforcing programs, plans, and
VT LEG #379219 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.146
2025 Page 42 of 68
practices developed for the proper management of composting facilities when
those facilities are located on a farm. On or before January 15, 2016, the
Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets and the Secretary of Natural
Resources shall each develop three separate measures of the performance of
the agencies under the memorandum of understanding required by this
subsection. Beginning on January 15, 2017 and annually thereafter, the
Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets and the Secretary of Natural
Resources shall submit separate reports to the Senate Committee on
Agriculture, the House Committee on Agriculture, Food Resiliency, and
Forestry, the Senate Committee on Natural Resources and Energy, and the
House Committee on Environment and Energy regarding the success of each
agency in meeting the performance measures for the memorandum of
understanding. [Repealed.]
§ 4810a. REQUIRED AGRICULTURAL PRACTICES; REVISION
(a) The Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets shall maintain the
Required Agricultural Practices in order to improve water quality in the State,
ensure practices on all farms eliminate adverse impacts to water quality, and
implement the small farm certification program required by section 4871 of
this title. At a minimum, the Required Agricultural Practices shall:
(1) Specify those farms that:
VT LEG #379219 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.146
2025 Page 43 of 68
(A) are required to comply with the small farm certification
requirements under section 4871 of this title due to the potential impact of the
farm or type of farm on water quality as a result of livestock managed on the
farm, agricultural inputs used by the farm, or tillage practices on the farm; and
(B) shall be subject to the Required Agricultural Practices but shall
not be required to comply with small farm certification requirements under
section 4871 of this title.
(2)(A) Except as authorized under subdivision (C) of this subdivision
(2), prohibit a farm from stacking or piling manure, storing fertilizer, or storing
other nutrients on the farm:
(i) in a manner and location that presents a threat of discharge to a
water of the State or presents a threat of contamination to groundwater; or
(ii) on lands in a floodway or otherwise subject to annual flooding.
(B) Except as authorized under subdivision (C) of this subdivision
(2), manure stacking or piling sites, fertilizer storage, or other nutrient storage
shall not be located within 200 feet of a private well or within 200 feet of a
water of the State.
(C) The Secretary may authorize one or more of the following:
(i) siting of manure stacking or piling sites, fertilizer storage, or
other nutrient storage within 200 feet, but not less than 100 feet, of a private
well or surface water if the Secretary determines that the site is the best
VT LEG #379219 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.146
2025 Page 44 of 68
available site on the farm for the purposes of protecting groundwater quality or
surface water quality; and
(ii) siting of a waste storage facility within 200 feet of a surface
water or private well if the site is the best available site on the farm for the
purposes of protecting groundwater quality or surface water quality and the
waste storage facility is designed by a licensed engineer to meet the
requirements of section 4815 of this title.
(3) Require the construction and management of barnyards, waste
management systems, animal holding areas, and production areas in a manner
to prevent runoff of waste to a surface water, to groundwater, or across
property boundaries.
(4) Establish standards for nutrient management on farms, including:
(A) required nutrient management planning on all farms that manage
agricultural wastes; and
(B) recommended practices for improving and maintaining soil
quality and healthy soils in order to increase the capacity of soil to retain water,
improve flood resiliency, reduce sedimentation, reduce reliance on fertilizers
and pesticides, and prevent agricultural stormwater runoff.
(5) Require cropland on the farm to be cultivated in a manner that
results in an average soil loss of less than or equal to the soil loss tolerance for
the prevalent soil, known as 1T, as calculated through application of the
VT LEG #379219 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.146
2025 Page 45 of 68
Revised Universal Soil Loss Equation or through the application of similarly
accepted models.
(6)(A) Require a farm to comply with standards established by the
Secretary for maintaining a vegetative buffer zone of perennial vegetation
between annual croplands and the top of the bank of an adjoining water of the
State. At a minimum the vegetative buffer standards established by the
Secretary shall prohibit the application of manure on the farm within 25 feet of
the top of the bank of an adjoining water of the State or within 10 feet of a
ditch that is not a surface water under State law and that is not a water of the
United States under federal law.
(B) Establish standards for site-specific vegetative buffers that
adequately address water quality needs based on consideration of soil type,
slope, crop type, proximity to water, and other relevant factors.
(7) [Repealed.]
(8) Regulate, in a manner consistent with the Agency of Natural
Resources’ flood hazard area and river corridor rules, the construction or siting
of a farm structure or the storage of manure, fertilizer, or pesticides within a
river corridor designated by the Secretary of Natural Resources.
(9) Establish standards for the exclusion of livestock from the waters of
the State to prevent erosion and adverse water quality impacts.
VT LEG #379219 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.146
2025 Page 46 of 68
(10) Establish standards for soil conservation practices such as cover
cropping.
(11) Allow for alternative techniques or practices, approved by the
Secretary, for compliance by an owner or operator of a farm when the owner or
operator cannot comply with the requirements of the Required Agricultural
Practices due to site-specific conditions. Approved alternative techniques or
practices shall meet State requirements to reduce adverse impacts to water
quality.
(b) The Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets shall maintain the
Required Agricultural Practices in order to include requirements for reducing
nutrient contribution to waters of the State from subsurface tile drainage.
Upon adoption of requirements for subsurface tile drainage, the Secretary may
require an existing subsurface tile drain to comply with the requirements of the
RAPs for subsurface tile drainage upon a determination that compliance is
necessary to reduce adverse impacts to water quality from the subsurface tile
drain.
(c) The Secretary shall amend the Required Agricultural Practices to
include requirements for activities occurring in areas that are excluded from
regulation by the Agency of Natural Resources under 10 V.S.A. § 902 because
the area is used to grow food or crops in connection with farming activities.
[Repealed.]
VT LEG #379219 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.146
2025 Page 47 of 68
§ 4811. POWERS OF SECRETARY
The Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets in furtherance of the
purposes of this chapter may:
(1) Make, adopt, revise, and amend reasonable rules that define
practices described in section 4810 of this title as well as other rules deemed
necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter. [Repealed.]
(2) Appoint assistants, subject to applicable laws, to perform or assist in
the performance of any duties or functions of the Secretary under this chapter.
(3) Enter any lands, public or private, and review and copy any land
management records as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this
chapter. [Repealed.]
(4) Sign memorandums of understanding between agencies when the
Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets agrees it is necessary for the
success of the program. [Repealed.]
(5) Solicit and receive federal or private funds.
(6) Cooperate fully with the federal government or other agencies in the
operation of any joint federal-state programs concerning the regulation of
agricultural nonpoint source pollution.
(7) Establish programs to improve agricultural water quality.
(8) Provide grants or contracts from agricultural water quality programs
established under this chapter, or by the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and
VT LEG #379219 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.146
2025 Page 48 of 68
Markets, for the purpose of providing technical and financial assistance in
preventing agricultural pollution from entering groundwater and waters of the
State, provided that the Secretary shall only use capital funding available to the
Agency for water quality programs or projects that are eligible for capital
assistance.
* * *
§ 4813. BASIN MANAGEMENT; APPEALS TO THE ENVIRONMENTAL
DIVISION
(a) The Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets shall cooperate with
the Secretary of Natural Resources in the basin planning process with regard to
the agricultural nonpoint source waste component of each basin plan. Any
person with an interest in the agricultural nonpoint source component of the
basin planning process may petition the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and
Markets to require, and the Secretary may require, best management practices
in the individual basin beyond Required Agricultural Practices adopted by rule,
in order to achieve compliance with the water quality goals in 10 V.S.A. §
1250 and any duly adopted basin plan. The Secretary of Agriculture, Food and
Markets shall hold a public hearing within 60 days and shall issue a timely
written decision that sets forth the facts and reasons supporting the decision.
(b) Any person engaged in farming that has been required by the Secretary
of Agriculture, Food and Markets to implement best management practices or
VT LEG #379219 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.146
2025 Page 49 of 68
any person who has petitioned the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets
under subsection (a) of this section may appeal the Secretary of Agriculture,
Food and Markets’ decision to the Environmental Division de novo.
(c) When requiring implementation of a best management practice, the
Secretary shall inform a farmer of the resources available to assist the farmer in
implementing the best management practice and complying with the
requirements of this chapter. [Repealed.]
* * *
§ 4815. WASTE STORAGE FACILITY
(a) No person shall construct a new waste storage facility or expand or
modify a waste storage facility in existence on July 1, 2006 unless the facility
meets the standard established for such facilities by the Natural Resources
Conservation Service of the U.S. Department of Agriculture or an equivalent
standard. If an equivalent design standard is used, the design and construction
shall be certified by the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets or a
licensed professional engineer operating within the scope of the engineer’s
expertise.
(b) The Secretary may require the owner or operator of a waste storage
facility in existence on July 1, 2006 to modify the facility to meet the standard
set forth in subsection (a) of this section if the facility poses a threat to human
health or the environment. If the Secretary determines that a facility that meets
VT LEG #379219 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.146
2025 Page 50 of 68
the standard set forth in subsection (a) of this section poses a threat to human
health or the environment, the Secretary may require the owner or operator of
the facility to implement additional management measures.
(c) If the Secretary suspects that a waste storage facility may be
contaminating groundwater, the Secretary shall pay the costs of any initial
groundwater monitoring to determine whether a facility poses a threat to
human health or the environment. Within 21 days after a determination under
this subsection that a facility poses a threat to human health or the environment
because of apparent violation of the Groundwater Protection Standards, the
Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets shall notify the Department of
Health and the Secretary of Natural Resources of the location of the facility
and the name of its owner or operator.
(d) As used in this section, “waste storage facility” means an impoundment
made for the purpose of storing agricultural waste by constructing an
embankment, excavating a pit or dugout, fabricating an inground and
aboveground structure, or any combination thereof. [Repealed.]
§ 4816. SEASONAL APPLICATION OF MANURE
(a) Prohibition on application. A person shall not apply manure to land in
the State between December 15 and April 1 of any calendar year unless
authorized by this section.
VT LEG #379219 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.146
2025 Page 51 of 68
(b) Extension of prohibition. The Secretary of Agriculture, Food and
Markets shall amend the Required Agricultural Practices by rule in order to
establish a process under which the Secretary may prohibit the application of
manure to land in the State between December 1 and December 15 and
between April 1 and April 30 of any calendar year when the Secretary
determines that due to weather conditions, soil conditions, or other limitations,
application of manure to land would pose a significant potential of discharge or
runoff to State waters.
(c) Seasonal exemption. The Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets
shall amend the Required Agricultural Practices by rule in order to establish a
process under which the Secretary may authorize an exemption to the
prohibition on the application of manure to land in the State between
December 15 and April 1 of any calendar year or during any period established
under subsection (b) of this section when manure is prohibited from
application. Any process established for the issuance of an exemption under
the Required Agricultural Practices may authorize land application of manure
on a weekly, monthly, or seasonal basis or in authorized regions, areas, or
fields in the State, provided that any exemption shall:
(1) prohibit application of manure:
(A) in areas with established channels of concentrated stormwater
runoff to surface waters, including ditches and ravines;
VT LEG #379219 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.146
2025 Page 52 of 68
(B) in nonharvested permanent vegetative buffers;
(C) in a nonfarmed wetland, as that term is defined in 10 V.S.A. §
902(5);
(D) within 50 feet of a potable water supply, as that term is defined in
10 V.S.A. § 1972(6);
(E) to fields exceeding tolerable soil loss; and
(F) to saturated soils;
(2) establish requirements for the application of manure when frozen or
snow-covered soils prevent effective incorporation at the time of application;
(3) require manure to be applied according to a nutrient management
plan; and
(4) establish the maximum tons of manure that may be applied per acre
during any one application. [Repealed.]
§ 4817. MANAGEMENT OF NON-SEWAGE WASTE
(a) As used in this section:
(1) “Non-sewage waste” means any waste other than sewage that may
contain organisms pathogenic to human beings but does not mean stormwater
runoff.
(2) “Sewage” means waste containing human fecal coliform and other
potential pathogenic organisms from sanitary waste and used water from any
VT LEG #379219 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.146
2025 Page 53 of 68
building, including carriage water and shower and wash water. “Sewage” does
not mean stormwater runoff as that term is defined in 10 V.S.A. § 1264.
(b) The Secretary may require a person transporting or arranging for the
transport of non-sewage waste to a farm for deposit in a manure pit or for use
as an input in a methane digester to obtain approval from the Secretary prior to
transporting the non-sewage waste to the farm. The Secretary may require a
person to report to the Secretary at a designated time one or more of the
following:
(1) the composition of the material transported to the farm, including the
source of the material; and
(2) the volume of the material transported to a farm.
(c) After receipt of a report required under subsection (b) of this section, the
Secretary may prohibit the import of non-sewage waste onto a farm upon a
determination that the import of the material would violate the nutrient
management plan for the farm or otherwise present a threat to water quality.
[Repealed.]
* * *
Subchapter 3. Water Quality; Financial and Technical Assistance
* * *
VT LEG #379219 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.146
2025 Page 54 of 68
§ 4826. COST ASSISTANCE FOR WASTE STORAGE FACILITIES
(a) The owner or operator of a farm required under section 4815 of this title
to design, construct, or modify a waste storage facility may apply in writing to
the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets for cost assistance. Using
State or federal funds, or both, a State assistance grant shall be awarded,
subject to the availability of funds, to applicants. Such grants shall not exceed
90 percent of the cost of an adequately sized and designed waste storage
facility and the equipment eligible for Natural Resources Conservation Service
cost share assistance. Application for a State assistance grant shall be made in
the manner prescribed by the Secretary.
(b) If the Secretary lacks adequate funds necessary for the cost assistance
awards required by subsection (a) of this section, the Secretary shall appear
before the Emergency Board, as soon as possible, and shall request that
necessary funds be provided. If the Emergency Board fails to provide
adequate funds, the design and construction requirements for waste storage
facilities under subsection 4815(b) of this title and the RAPs for groundwater,
as they relate to a waste storage facility, shall be suspended for a farm with a
waste storage facility subject to the requirements of subsection 4815(b) of this
title until adequate funding becomes available. Suspension of the design and
construction requirements of subsection 4815(b) of this title does not relieve an
owner or operator of a farm permitted under section 4858 or 4851 of this title
VT LEG #379219 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.146
2025 Page 55 of 68
from the remaining requirements of the owner’s or operator’s permit, including
discharge standards, groundwater protection, nutrient management planning,
and land application of manure. This subsection does not apply to farms
permitted under 10 V.S.A. § 1263.
(c) The owner or operator of a farm with a waste storage facility may apply
in writing to the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets for a State
assistance grant for the costs of complying with the U.S. Department of
Agriculture Natural Resources Conservation Service requirements for
inspection of a waste storage facility. Such grants shall not exceed 90 percent
of the cost of the inspection of the waste storage facility. Application for a
State assistance grant shall be made in the manner prescribed by the Secretary.
[Repealed.]
* * *
Sec. 7. REPEALS
(a) 6 V.S.A. § 4803 (Agricultural Water Quality Special Fund) shall be
repealed on July 1, 2027.
(b) 6 V.S.A. §§ 4850–4855 (regulation of large farm operations) shall be
repealed on July 1, 2027.
(c) 6 V.S.A. chapter 215, subchapter 5 (regulation of medium and small
farm operations) shall be repealed on July 1, 2027.
VT LEG #379219 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.146
2025 Page 56 of 68
(d) 6 V.S.A. chapter 215, subchapter 5a (small farm certification) shall be
repealed on July 1, 2027.
(e) 6 V.S.A. chapter 215, subchapter 10 (enforcement) shall be repealed on
July 1, 2027.
* * * Conforming Changes to Statute * * *
Sec. 8. 6 V.S.A. § 366 is amended to read:
§ 366. TONNAGE FEES
(a) A person distributing fertilizer to a nonregistrant consumer in the State
annually shall pay the following fees to the Secretary:
(1) a $150.00 minimum tonnage fee;
(2) $0.50 per ton of agricultural fertilizer distributed; and
(3) $30.00 per ton of nonagricultural fertilizer distributed.
* * *
(g)(1) All fees collected under subdivisions (a)(1) and (2) of this section
shall be deposited in the special fund created by subsection 364(f) of this title
and used in accordance with its provisions.
(2) All fees collected under subdivision (a)(3) of this section shall be
deposited in the Agricultural Water Quality Special Fund created under section
4803 of this title Clean Water Fund established under 10 V.S.A. § 1388.
* * *
VT LEG #379219 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.146
2025 Page 57 of 68
Sec. 9. 6 V.S.A. § 563 is amended to read:
§ 563. HEMP; AN AGRICULTURAL PRODUCT
(a) Hemp is an agricultural product that may be grown as a crop produced,
possessed, marketed, and commercially traded in Vermont pursuant to the
provisions of this chapter and section 10113 of the Agriculture Improvement
Act of 2018, Pub. L. No. 115-334.
* * *
(d) The cultivation of hemp shall be subject to and comply with the
Required Agricultural Practices adopted under section 4810 of this title, as
amended 10 V.S.A. § 1325.
Sec. 10. 6 V.S.A. § 918(b) is amended to read:
(b) The registrant shall pay an annual fee of $200.00 for each product
registered, and $185.00 of that amount shall be deposited in the special fund
created in section 929 of this title. Of the registration fees collected under this
subsection, $15.00 of the amount collected shall be deposited in the
Agricultural Water Quality Special Fund under section 4803 of this title Clean
Water Fund established under 10 V.S.A. § 1388. Of the registration fees
collected under this subsection, $25.00 of the amount collected shall be used to
offset the additional costs of inspection of economic poison products and to
provide educational services, training, and technical assistance to pesticide
applicators, beekeepers, and the general public regarding the effects of
VT LEG #379219 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.146
2025 Page 58 of 68
pesticides on pollinators and the methods or best management practices to
reduce the impacts of pesticides on pollinators. The annual registration year
shall be from December 1 to November 30 of the following year.
Sec. 11. 10 V.S.A. § 905b is amended to read:
§ 905b. DUTIES; POWERS
The Department shall protect and manage the water resources of the State in
accordance with the provisions of this subchapter and shall:
* * *
(18) Study and investigate the wetlands of the State and cooperate with
municipalities, the general public, other agencies, and the Board in collecting
and compiling data relating to wetlands; propose to the Board specific
wetlands to be designated as Class I wetlands; issue or deny permits pursuant
to section 913 of this title and the rules authorized by this subdivision; issue
wetland determinations pursuant to section 914 of this title; issue orders
pursuant to section 1272 of this title; and in accordance with 3 V.S.A. chapter
25, adopt rules to address the following:
* * *
(C) The protection of wetlands that have been determined under
subdivision (A) or (B) of this subdivision (18) to be significant, including rules
that provide for the issuance or denial of permits and the issuance of wetland
determinations by the Department under this chapter; provided, however, that
VT LEG #379219 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.146
2025 Page 59 of 68
the rules may only protect the values and functions sought to be preserved by
the designation. The Department shall not adopt rules that restrain agricultural
activities without the consent of the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and
Markets and shall not adopt rules that restrain silvicultural activities without
the consent of the Commissioner of Forests, Parks and Recreation.
* * *
Sec. 12. 10 V.S.A. § 1266b(d) is amended to read:
(d) Application of fertilizer to impervious surface; in proximity to water;
and seasonal restriction. No person shall apply any fertilizer in one or more of
the following situations:
(1) to To an impervious surface. Fertilizer applied or released to an
impervious surface shall be immediately collected and returned to a container
for legal application. This subdivision shall not apply to activities regulated
under the required agricultural practices as those practices are defined by the
Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets under 6 V.S.A. § 4810;.
(2) to To turf before April 1 or after October 15 in any calendar year or
at any time when the ground is frozen; or.
(3) to To turf within 25 feet of a water of the State.
VT LEG #379219 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.146
2025 Page 60 of 68
Sec. 13. 10 V.S.A. § 1389b is amended to read:
§ 1389b. CLEAN WATER FUND AUDIT
(a) On or before January 15, 2023, the Secretary of Administration shall
submit to the House and Senate Committees on Appropriations, the Senate
Committee on Finance, the House Committee on Ways and Means, the Senate
Committee on Agriculture, the House Committee on Agriculture, Food
Resiliency, and Forestry, the Senate Committee on Natural Resources and
Energy, and the House Committee on Environment and Energy a program
audit of the Clean Water Fund. The audit shall include:
* * *
(4) an assessment of the capacity of the Agency of Agriculture, Food
and Markets to effectively administer and enforce agricultural water quality
requirements on farms in the State; [Repealed.]
* * *
Sec. 14. 10 V.S.A. § 1446(b)(7) is amended to read:
(7) Agricultural activities. Agricultural activities on land in agricultural
production on July 1, 2014, provided that:
(A) no impervious surface shall be created or expanded in a protected
shoreland area except: when no alternative outside the protected shoreland
area exists, the construction of a best management practice is necessary to
abate an agricultural water quality issue, and the best management practice is
VT LEG #379219 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.146
2025 Page 61 of 68
approved by the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets under 6 V.S.A.
chapter 215 Natural Resources under chapter 47, subchapter 3A of this title;
and
(B) the agricultural activities within the protected shoreland area
comply with the rules adopted by and permits the Secretary of Agriculture,
Food and Markets under 6 V.S.A. chapter 215 regarding agricultural water
quality, including required agricultural practices, best management practices,
medium and small farm operation, and large farm operation Natural Resources
adopts under chapter 47, subchapter 3A of this title.
Sec. 15. 10 V.S.A. § 1671(8) is amended to read:
(8) “Required agricultural practices” shall be as defined by the Secretary
of Agriculture, Food and Markets under 6 V.S.A. § 4810 in section 13221 of
this title.
Sec. 16. 10 V.S.A. § 1679(c) is amended to read:
(c) Rules adopted by the Secretary under subsection (a) of this section shall
include provisions for the identification of agricultural lands, as defined in 32
V.S.A. § 3752, within public water source protection areas and for ensuring
that required agricultural practices farming, as that term is defined in section
6001 if this title, on those lands are is not unduly restricted by the development
of the public water source protection area without the consent of the owner of
those agricultural lands. Prior to the adoption of rules under this subsection,
VT LEG #379219 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.146
2025 Page 62 of 68
the Secretary shall consult with the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets
and, if possible, obtain concurrence of the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and
Markets. If the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets does not concur,
the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets shall state any objections in
writing;, and those objections shall be included by the Secretary in filing the
final proposed rule with the Legislative Committee on Administrative Rules.
Sec. 17. 10 V.S.A. § 6001(3)(E) is amended to read:
(E) When development is proposed to occur on a parcel or tract of
land that is devoted to farming activity as defined in subdivision (22) of this
section, only those portions of the parcel or the tract that support the
development shall be subject to regulation under this chapter. Permits issued
under this chapter shall not impose conditions on other portions of the parcel or
tract of land that do not support the development and that restrict or conflict
with required agricultural practices adopted by the Secretary of Agriculture,
Food and Markets. Any portion of the tract that is used to produce compost
ingredients for a composting facility located elsewhere on the tract shall not
constitute land that supports the development unless it is also used for some
other purpose that supports the development.
Sec. 18. 10 V.S.A. § 6001(42) is amended to read:
(42) “Small farm” has the same meaning as in 6 V.S.A. § 4871 section
1321 of this title and also means a small farm that is subject to the Required
VT LEG #379219 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.146
2025 Page 63 of 68
Agricultural Practices Rule (RAPs) and is not required to certify as a small
farm under Section 4 of the RAPs, section 1324c of this title and is not
required to operate as a Medium Farm Operation under 6 V.S.A. § 4858, and is
not required to operate as a Large Farm Operation under 6 V.S.A. § 4851
obtain a CAFO permit under chapter 47, subchapter 3A of this title.
Sec. 19. 24 V.S.A. § 4413(d)(1) is amended to read:
(d)(1) A bylaw under this chapter shall not regulate:
(A) required agricultural practices, including the construction of farm
structures, as those practices are defined and administered by the Secretary of
Agriculture, Food and Markets Natural Resources;
* * *
Sec. 20. 32 V.S.A. § 3752(5)(D) is amended to read:
(D) “Development” also means notification of the Director by the
Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets Natural Resources under section
3756 of this title that the owner or operator of agricultural land or a farm
building is violating the water quality requirements of 6 V.S.A. chapter 215 10
V.S.A. chapter 47 or is failing to comply with the terms of an order issued
under 6 V.S.A. chapter 215, subchapter 10 10 V.S.A. chapter 201.
Sec. 21. 32 V.S.A. § 3756(i) is amended to read:
(i)(1) After providing 30 days’ notice to the owner, the Director shall
remove from use value appraisal an entire parcel of managed forestland and
VT LEG #379219 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.146
2025 Page 64 of 68
notify the owner when the Commissioner of Forests, Parks and Recreation has
not received a required management activity report or has received an adverse
inspection report, unless the lack of conformance consists solely of the failure
to make prescribed planned cutting. In that case, the Director may delay
removal from use value appraisal for a period of one year at a time to allow
time to bring the parcel into conformance with the plan.
(2)(A) The Director shall remove from use value appraisal an entire
parcel or parcels of agricultural land and farm buildings identified by the
Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets Natural Resources as being used
by a person:
(i) found, after administrative hearing, or contested judicial
hearing or motion, to be in violation of water quality requirements established
under 6 V.S.A. chapter 215, 10 V.S.A. chapter 47 or any rules adopted or any
permit or certification issued under 6 V.S.A. chapter 215 10 V.S.A. chapter 47;
or
(ii) who is not in compliance with the terms of an administrative
or court order issued under 6 V.S.A. chapter 215, subchapter 10 10 V.S.A.
chapter 201 to remedy a violation of the requirements of 6 V.S.A. chapter 215
10 V.S.A. chapter 47 or any rules adopted or any permit or certification issued
under 6 V.S.A. chapter 215 10 V.S.A. chapter 47.
VT LEG #379219 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.146
2025 Page 65 of 68
(B) The Director shall notify the owner that agricultural land or a
farm building has been removed from use value appraisal by providing
notification of removal to the owner. After removal of agricultural land or a
farm building from use value appraisal under this section, the Director shall not
consider a new application for use value appraisal for the agricultural land or
farm building until the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets Natural
Resources submits to the Director a certification that the owner or operator of
the agricultural land or farm building is complying with the water quality
requirements of 6 V.S.A. chapter 215 10 V.S.A. chapter 47 or an order issued
under 6 V.S.A. chapter 215 10 V.S.A. chapter 47 or 10 V.S.A. chapter 201.
After submission of a certification by the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and
Markets Natural Resources, an owner or operator shall be eligible to apply for
enrollment of the agricultural land or farm building according to the
requirements of this section.
Sec. 22. 32 V.S.A. § 3758(e) is amended to read:
(e) When the Director removes agricultural land or a farm building
pursuant to notification from the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets
Natural Resources under section 3756 of this title, the exclusive right of appeal
shall be as provided in 6 V.S.A. § 4996(a).
VT LEG #379219 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.146
2025 Page 66 of 68
* * * Permit Fees * * *
Sec. 23. 3 V.S.A. § 2822(j) is amended to read:
(j) In accordance with subsection (i) of this section, the following fees are
established for permits, licenses, certifications, approvals, registrations, orders,
and other actions taken by the Agency of Natural Resources.
* * *
(2) For discharge permits issued under 10 V.S.A. chapter 47 and orders
issued under 10 V.S.A. § 1272, an administrative processing fee of $240.00
shall be paid at the time of application for a discharge permit in addition to any
application review fee and any annual operating fee, except for permit
applications under subdivisions (A)(iii)(III) and (V) of this subdivision (j)(2):
(A) Application review fee:
* * *
(v) CAFO permit
(I) Large CAFO $750.00
(II) Medium CAFO $500.00
(III) Small CAFO $250.00
* * *
(B) Annual operating fee.
* * *
(vi) CAFO permit
VT LEG #379219 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.146
2025 Page 67 of 68
(I) Large CAFO $2,500.00
(II) Medium CAFO $1,500.00
(III) Small CAFO $500.00
* * *
* * * Implementation * * *
Sec. 24. TRANSITION; IMPLEMENTATION
(a) On or before January 1, 2026, the Secretary of Natural Resources shall
submit to the House and Senate Committees on Appropriations a report
recommending sufficient appropriations and staffing for the Agency of Natural
Resources to implement and enforce the agricultural water quality requirement
of 10 V.S.A. chapter 47, subchapter 3A.
(b) All pending enforcement actions of the Secretary of Agriculture, Food
and Markets under 6 V.S.A. chapter 215 shall be transferred to the Secretary of
Natural Resources on July 1, 2027 for enforcement under 10 V.S.A. chapter
201. A previous enforcement action of the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and
Markets against a farm under 6 V.S.A. 1 chapter 215 shall not preclude or
prevent the Secretary of Natural Resources from enforcing violations of 10
V.S.A. chapter 47 that occur on or after July 1, 2025.
(c) All monies in the Agricultural Water Quality Special Fund created
under 6 V.S.A. § 4803 shall be deposited in the Agricultural Water Quality
Special Fund created under 10 V.S.A. § 1354 on July 1, 2027.
VT LEG #379219 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.146
2025 Page 68 of 68
(d) The memorandum of understanding adopted by the Secretary of Natural
Resources and the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets prior to the
effective date of this act pursuant to 10 V.S.A. §§ 1259(i) and 8003(d) shall be
rescinded on July 1, 2027.
* * * Statutory Revision * * *
Sec. 25. STATUTORY REVISION; AGRICULTURAL PRACTICES
In its statutory revision capacity under 2 V.S.A. § 424, the Office of
Legislative Counsel is authorized, where appropriate, to replace the words
“Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets” or “Agency of Agriculture, Food
and Markets” with the appropriate words or phrase to reflect the transfer of the
agricultural water quality program from the Agency of Agriculture, Food and
Markets to the Agency of Natural Resources under 10 V.S.A. chapter 47,
subchapter 3A.
* * * Effective Date * * *
Sec. 26. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379219 v.1